District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

9-1219.19

Closing of alley upon acquisition by District of abutting property

Repealed.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 706, 30 DCR 148

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 7-309 to 7-312.